Washington statutes.
RCW 26.14.100

Temporary order or award.

(1) Before an arbitrator is selected and able to act, on motion of a party, the court may enter a temporary order granting any of the relief provided in RCW 26.09.060 and 26.09.197.

(2) After an arbitrator is selected:

(a) The arbitrator may make a temporary award granting any of the relief provided in RCW 26.09.060 and 26.09.197, except for relief pertaining to a protection order as defined in RCW 26.14.110, in which case the procedures under RCW 26.14.110 apply; and

(b) If the matter is urgent and the arbitrator is not able to act in a timely manner or provide an adequate remedy, on motion of a party, the court may enter a temporary order, pending further hearing by the arbitrator or the court.

(3) On motion of a party, before the court confirms a final award, the court under RCW 26.14.150, 26.14.170, or 26.14.180 may confirm, correct, vacate, or amend a temporary award made under subsection (2)(a) of this section.

(4) On motion of a party, the court may enforce a subpoena or interim award issued by an arbitrator for the fair and expeditious disposition of the arbitration.

[ 2023 c 61 s 11.]